District of Columbia statutes.
3-1207.33

Repealed

Eligibility for license renewal.

Repealed.

Mar. 25, 1986, D.C. Law 6-99, § 732
as added Mar. 14, 1995, D.C. Law 10-205, § 2(f), 41 DCR 7712
July 7, 2009, D.C. Law 18-17, § 2(c), 56 DCR 3622
1981 Ed., § 2-3307.33.